asdf/dicionarios/pt_pt.aff
SFX 49 Y 48
SFX 49   erir            iro             erir            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   ir              es              erir            +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   ir              e               erir            +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   r               mos             erir            +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   r               s               erir            +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   ir              em              erir            +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   erir            ira             erir            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 49   erir            iras            erir            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 49   erir            iramos          erir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   erir            irais           erir            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   erir            iram            erir            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   ir              e               erir            +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 49   erir            ira             erir            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 49   erir            iramos          erir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ir              i               erir            +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   erir            iram            erir            +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ar              io              ear             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   ar              ias             ear             +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   ar              ia              ear             +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   r               mos             ear             +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   r               is              ear             +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   ar              iam             ear             +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   ar              ie              ear             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 49   ar              ies             ear             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 49   ar              emos            ear             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   ar              eis             ear             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   ar              iem             ear             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   ar              ia              ear             +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 49   ar              ie              ear             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 49   ar              emos            ear             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ar              ai              ear             +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ar              iem             ear             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ir              o               uzir            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   ir              es              uzir            +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   zir             z               uzir            +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 49   r               mos             uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   r               s               uzir            +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   ir              em              uzir            +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 49   ir              a               uzir            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 49   ir              as              uzir            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 49   ir              amos            uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   ir              ais             uzir            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   ir              am              uzir            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 49   zir             z               uzir            +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 49   ir              a               uzir            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 49   ir              amos            uzir            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ir              i               uzir            +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 49   ir              am              uzir            +P=3,N=p,T=i

SFX 50 Y 4
SFX 50   0               s               ão              +N=p
SFX 50   il              eis             il              +N=p
SFX 50   os              as              entos           +G=f
SFX 50   0               s               [^aeiouls]      +N=p

SFX 51 Y 4
SFX 51   o               0               ão              +G=f
SFX 51   o               s               ão              +G=f,N=p
SFX 51   0               ssa             e               +G=f
SFX 51   0               ssas            e               +G=f,N=p

SFX 52 Y 8
SFX 52   r               ção             [ae]r           +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   r               ção             [^zg]ir         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   zir             ção             zir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   r               sição           por             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   r               ções            [ae]r           +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   r               ções            [^zg]ir         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   zir             ções            zir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX 52   r               sições          por             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao

SFX 53 Y 30
SFX 53   o               idade           [^çgi]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ço              cidade          ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   go              guidade         go              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   o               edade           [^r]io          +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   o               edade           [^áó]rio        +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ário            ariedade        ário            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ório            oriedade        ório            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   e               idade           e               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   0               idade           r               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   0               idade           [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   vel             bilidade        [^áíú]vel       +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ável            abilidade       ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ível            ibilidade       ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   úvel            ubilidade       úvel            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   z               cidade          z               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   o               idades          [^çgi]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ço              cidades         ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   go              guidades        go              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   o               edades          [^r]io          +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   o               edades          [^áó]rio        +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ário            ariedades       ário            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ório            oriedades       ório            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   e               idades          e               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   0               idades          r               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   0               idades          [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   vel             bilidades       [^áí]vel        +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ável            abilidades      ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   ível            ibilidades      ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   úvel            ubilidades      úvel            +CAR=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX 53   z               cidades         z               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd

SFX 54 Y 2
SFX 54   0               es              l               +N=p
SFX 54   o               es              ão              +N=p

SFX 55 Y 12
SFX 55   o               a               [^ã]o           +G=f
SFX 55   o               as              [^ã]o           +G=f,N=p
SFX 55   0               a               [^aeiouscn]     +G=f
SFX 55   0               as              [^aeiouscn]     +G=f,N=p
SFX 55   0               a               [^ê]s           +G=f
SFX 55   0               as              [^ê]s           +G=f,N=p
SFX 55   ês              esa             ês              +G=f
SFX 55   ês              esas            ês              +G=f,N=p
SFX 55   ão              ona             ão              +G=f
SFX 55   ão              onas            ão              +G=f,N=p
SFX 55   e               a               e               +G=f
SFX 55   e               as              e               +G=f,N=p

SFX 56 Y 2
SFX 56   ão              oa              ão              +G=f
SFX 56   ão              oas             ão              +G=f,N=p

SFX 57 Y 27
SFX 57   o               inha            [^cgçãi]o       +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   a               inha            [^çg]a          +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   co              quinha          co              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   ço              cinha           ço              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   o               uinha           go              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   ca              quinha          ca              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   ça              cinha           ça              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   a               uinha           ga              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   á               azinha          á               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   ã               azinha          ã               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   0               zinha           ãe              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   e               inha            [^ã]e           +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   0               zinha           [irunl]         +G=f,GR=dim
SFX 57   m               nzinha          m               +G=m,GR=dim
SFX 57   o               inhas           [^cgçãi]o       +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   a               inhas           [^çg]a          +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   ca              quinhas         ca              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   ça              cinhas          ça              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   a               uinhas          ga              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   co              quinhas         co              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   ço              cinhas          ço              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   o               uinhas          go              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   á               azinhas         á               +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   ã               azinhas         ã               +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   e               inhas           [^ã]e           +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   0               zinhas          [irunl]         +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX 57   m               nzinhas         m               +G=m,N=p,GR=dim

SFX 58 Y 24
SFX 58   o               ismo            [^cçã]o         +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   co              quismo          co              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ço              cismo           ço              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ção             cionismo        ção             +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   a               ismo            [^icg]a         +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   a               smo             ia              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ca              quismo          ca              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ga              guismo          ga              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   e               ismo            e               +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   0               ismo            [lr]            +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ês              esismo          ês              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   m               nismo           m               +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   o               ismos           [^cçã]o         +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   co              quismos         co              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ço              cismos          ço              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ção             cionismos       ção             +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   a               ismos           [^icg]a         +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   a               smos            ia              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ca              quismos         ca              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ga              guismos         ga              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   e               ismos           e               +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   0               ismos           [lr]            +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   ês              esismos         ês              +FSEM=ismo
SFX 58   m               nismos          m               +FSEM=ismo
